Massachusetts, session 194th, H5047.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding section 2 of chapter 79 of the General Laws and any other general or
special law to the contrary, the division of capital asset management and maintenance shall, for
the purpose of ensuring access to health care for the public, take by eminent domain, pursuant to
said chapter 79: (1) a certain parcel of land, commonly known as Norwood hospital, owned by
MPT of Norwood-Steward, LLC located at 800 Washington street in the town of Norwood
identified on the town of Norwood assessor’s map as map 2, lot 6-1 and being one of the parcels
described in a deed recorded with the Norfolk county registry of deeds in book 36099, page 419;
and (2) any adjacent parcels of land owned by MPT of Norwood-Steward, LLC as necessary to
effectuate the purposes of this act.
of 1